Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1301.01
Entering foster care; determination of time.

For the purpose of determining the timing of review hearings, permanency hearings, and other requirements under the Foster Care Review Act, a child is deemed to have entered foster care on the earlier of the date of the first judicial finding that the child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect or the date that is sixty days after the date on which the child is removed from the home.

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 35.